nb: Utskiftbarhet for pigger: Fast; Utskiftbar; Uten pigger; Annet
zh-CN: 钉刺可替换性: 固定式; 可替换式; 无钉式; 其他
sk-SK: Vymeniteľnosť hrotov: Pevné; Vymeniteľné; Bez hrotov; Iné
en: Spike replaceability: Fixed; Replaceable; Spikeless; Other
bg-BG: Възможност за подмяна на шиповете: Фиксиран; Сменяем; Без шипове; Друго
fr: Remplaçabilité des pointes: Fixe; Remplaçable; Sans pointes; Autre
nl: Spike vervangbaarheid: Vast; Vervangbaar; Zonder spikes; Overige
ja: スパイク交換可否: 固定式; 交換式; スパイクレス; その他
lt-LT: Dyglių keičiamumas: Fiksuoti; Keičiami; Be dyglių; Kita
hu: Tüskék cserélhetősége: Fix; Cserélhető; Tüske nélküli; Egyéb
ro-RO: Posibilitate de înlocuire a crampoanelor: Fix; Înlocuibil; Fără crampoane; Altele
th: ความสามารถในการเปลี่ยนเดือย: ถอดไม่ได้; เปลี่ยนได้; ไม่มีปุ่ม; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Zamenljivost žebljičkov: Fiksno; Zamenljivo; Brez konic; Drugo
ko: 스파이크 교체 가능성: 고정형; 교체형; 스파이크리스; 기타
ru: Возможность замены шипов: Фиксированные; Сменные; Без шипов; Другое
hr-HR: Zamjenjivost šiljaka: Fiksno; Izmjenjivo; Bez šiljaka; Ostalo
tr: Çivi değiştirilebilirliği: Sabit; Değiştirilebilir; Çivisiz; Diğer
pt-BR: Cravo substituibilidade: Fixo; Substituível; Sem cravos; Outros
da: Udskiftelighed for pigge: Fast; Udskiftelig; Uden pigge; Andet
it: Sostituibilità dei tacchetti: Fisso; Sostituibile; Senza tacchetti; Altro
el: Δυνατότητα αντικατάστασης καρφιών: Σταθερά; Αντικαταστάσιμα; Χωρίς καρφιά; Άλλο
pt-PT: Substituibilidade dos pitões: Fixo; Substituível; Sem bicos; Outro
cs: Vyměnitelnost hrotů: Pevné; Vyměnitelné; Bez hrotů; Jiné
zh-TW: 鞋釘可替換性: 固定式; 可替換; 無釘; 其他
es: Reemplazabilidad de los tapones: Fijo; Reemplazable; Sin clavos; Otro
sv: Utbytbarhet av spikar: Fasta; Utbytbara; Utan spikar; Annat
fi: Piikkien vaihdettavuus: Kiinteä; Vaihdettava; Piikitön; Muu
de: Austauschbarkeit der Spikes: Fest; Austauschbar; Ohne Spikes; Sonstige
pl: Możliwość wymiany kolców: Stałe; Wymienne; Bez kolców; Inne
vi: Khả năng thay thế gai: Cố định; Có thể thay thế; Không đinh; Khác